New Jersey, session 221, S4409.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. P.L.2021, c.32 (C.18A:35-4.36a) is repealed. 2. This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT This bill repeals current State that requires school districts to provide instruction on diversity and inclusion, P.L.2021, c.32 (C.18A:35-4.36a). The law provides that school districts incorporate the instruction in an appropriate place in the curriculum of students in grades kindergarten through 12 as part of the implementation of the New Jersey Student Learning Standards.